apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="s/eek__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>eek</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eek</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eeks</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eeking</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eeking</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eeking</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="sh/ear__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ear</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ear</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ears</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eared</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eared</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>orn</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>earing</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>earing</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>earing</l>        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="sho/e__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="st/ink__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ink</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ink</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inks</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ank</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>unk</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ank</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>unk</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inking</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inking</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inking</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="sl/ay__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ay</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ay</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ays</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ew</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ain</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aying</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aying</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aying</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="slid/e__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="br/eak__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>eak</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eak</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eaks</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>oke</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>oken</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eaking</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eaking</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eaking</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="sp/in__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ins</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>un</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>an</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>un</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inning</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inning</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inning</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="st/ave__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ave</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ave</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aves</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ove</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>aved</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ove</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>aved</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aving</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aving</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aving</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="seek out"><i>s</i><par n="s/eek__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="break out"><i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="break"><i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="break down"><i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="seek"><i>s</i><par n="s/eek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="seek work"><i>s</i><par n="s/eek__vblex"/><p><l><b/>work</l><r><g><b/>work</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shoe"><i>sho</i><par n="sho/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="speak"><i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spin"><i>sp</i><par n="sp/in__vblex"/></e>
